North Carolina statutes. Chapter 148. State Prison System.
Article 1. Organization and Management.
§ 148-4.
Control and custody of prisoners; authorizing prisoner to leave place of confinement. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction shall have control and custody of all prisoners serving sentence in the State prison system, and such prisoners shall be subject to all the rules and regulations legally adopted for the government thereof. Any sentence to imprisonment in any unit of the State prison system, or to jail to be assigned to work under the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction, shall be construed as a commitment, for such terms of imprisonment as the court may direct, to the custody of the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction or his authorized representative, who shall designate the places of confinement within the State prison system where the sentences of all such persons shall be served. The authorized agents of the Secretary shall have all the authority of peace officers for the purpose of transferring prisoners from place to place in the State as their duties might require and for apprehending, arresting, and returning to prison escaped prisoners, and may be commissioned by the Governor, either generally or specially, as special officers for returning escaped prisoners or other fugitives from justice from outside the State, when such persons have been extradited or voluntarily surrendered. Employees of departments, institutions, agencies, and political subdivisions of the State hiring prisoners to perform work outside prison confines may be designated as the authorized agents of the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction for the purpose of maintaining control and custody of prisoners who may be placed under the supervision and control of such employees, including guarding and transferring such prisoners from place to place in the State as their duties might require, and apprehending and arresting escaped prisoners and returning them to prison. The governing authorities of the State prison system are authorized to determine by rules and regulations the manner of designating these agents and placing prisoners under their supervision and control, which rules and regulations shall be established in the same manner as other rules and regulations for the government of the State prison system.

The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction may extend the limits of the place of confinement of a prisoner, as to whom there is reasonable cause to believe he will honor his trust, by authorizing him, under prescribed conditions, to leave the confines of that place unaccompanied by a custodial agent for a prescribed period of time to

Contact prospective employers; or

Secure a suitable residence for use when released on parole or upon discharge; or

Obtain medical services not otherwise available; or

Participate in a training program in the community; or

Visit or attend the funeral of a spouse, child (including stepchild, adopted child or child as to whom the prisoner, though not a natural parent, has acted in the place of a parent), parent (including a person though not a natural parent, has acted in the place of a parent), brother, or sister; or

Participate in community-based programs of rehabilitation, including, but not limited to the existing community volunteer and home-leave programs, pre-release and after-care programs as may be provided for and administered by the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction and other programs determined by the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction to be consistent with the prisoner’s rehabilitation and return to society; or

Be on maternity leave, for a period of time not to exceed 60 days. The county departments of social services are expected to cooperate with officials at the North Carolina Correctional Center for Women to coordinate prenatal care, financial services, and placement of the child; or

Receive palliative care, only in the case of a terminally ill inmate or a permanently and totally disabled inmate that the Secretary finds no longer poses a significant public safety risk, and only after consultation with any victims of the inmate or the victims’ families. For purposes of this subdivision, the term “terminally ill” describes an inmate who, as determined by a licensed physician, has an incurable condition caused by illness or disease that was unknown at the time of sentencing and was not diagnosed upon entry to prison, that will likely produce death within six months, and that is so debilitating that it is highly unlikely that the inmate poses a significant public safety risk. For purposes of this subdivision, the term “permanently and totally disabled” describes an inmate who, as determined by a licensed physician, suffers from permanent and irreversible physical incapacitation as a result of an existing physical or medical condition that was unknown at the time of sentencing and was not diagnosed upon entry to prison, and that is so incapacitating that it is highly unlikely that the inmate poses a significant public safety risk. The Department’s medical director shall notify the Secretary immediately when an inmate has been classified as terminally ill and shall provide regular reports on inmates classified as permanently and totally disabled. The Secretary shall act expeditiously in determining whether to extend the limits of confinement under this subdivision upon receiving notice that an inmate has been classified as terminally ill or permanently and totally disabled and, in the case of a terminally ill inmate, the Secretary shall make a good faith effort to reach a determination within 30 days of receiving notice of the inmate’s terminal condition.

The willful failure of a prisoner to remain within the extended limits of his confinement, or to return within the time prescribed to the place of confinement designated by the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction, shall be deemed an escape from the custody of the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction punishable as provided in

G.S. 148-45

.

History.

1901, c. 472, s. 4; Rev., s. 5390; C.S., s. 7706; 1925, c. 163; 1933, c. 172, ss. 5, 18; 1935, c. 257, s. 2; 1943, c. 409; 1955, c. 238, s. 2; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1959, c. 109; 1965, c. 1042; 1967, c. 996, ss. 13, 15; 1973, c. 902; c. 1262, s. 10; 1977, c. 704, s. 5; 1985, c. 483; 2001-424, s. 25.9(a); 2005-276, s. 17.13; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2012-83, s. 61; 2017-186, s. 2(vvvvvv); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 148-4

.

Pilot Program — Conducting Court Proceedings Using Videoconferencing Technology for Persons in Custody.

Session Laws
2009-270, ss. 1-4, provide: “SECTION 1. The Administrative Office of the Courts, in consultation with the Department of Correction [Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety], shall conduct a pilot program to test the feasibility of using videoconference or similar technology to conduct court proceedings involving defendants in the custody of the Department of Correction, instead of requiring live appearances in court for those defendants. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall designate two counties to participate in the pilot, and the Department of Correction shall designate one prison facility. The Administrative Office of the Courts may also designate one or more counties to participate in a pilot program involving persons in the custody of local confinement facilities to test the feasibility of using videoconferencing equipment to conduct proceedings authorized by this act but not otherwise authorized by law.

“SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the courts participating in the pilot program authorized by this act may conduct proceedings required under

G.S. 15A-511

, Article 26 of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes,

G.S. 15A-601

, and

G.S. 15A-941

by videoconference without the consent of the defendant. If a defendant voluntarily and knowingly waives his or her right to appear in person, the court may also accept guilty pleas and impose sentences in cases in which the plea is taken by videoconference, conduct hearings on motions, and conduct probation modification or revocation proceedings. The waiver may be taken by videoconference. In the jurisdictions participating in the pilot programs, no proceeding in which a person is charged with a capital felony may be conducted using videoconferencing equipment, but nothing in this act shall be construed to limit the use of testimony at a trial taken by videoconferencing equipment when the testimony is otherwise allowed by law to be taken in that manner.

“SECTION 3. The equipment used in conducting the videoconference proceedings authorized by this act shall be used in a manner that ensures that the judicial official conducting the proceeding and the defendant can see and hear each other and that ensures that the defendant and his or her attorney may communicate during the proceeding in a manner that preserves the defendant’s right to confidential communication with counsel.

“SECTION 4. The North Carolina Rural Courts Commission, in cooperation with the Department of Correction, shall study the effectiveness of the use of videoconferences for these proceedings and report its findings and recommendations for expansion or modification to the Chief Justice, the Secretary of Correction, [Secretary of Public Safety]the Chairs of the Senate and House Appropriations Subcommittees on Justice and Public Safety, and the Chairs of the Senate and House Appropriations Committees. The study shall address the costs of implementing videoconferencing on a statewide basis for these purposes, as well as the cost savings obtained through the use of such equipment, the quality of the transmissions, the frequency of use, and any other relevant information the Commission deems appropriate. The report shall be submitted no later than May 1, 2010. The Administrative Office of the Courts and the Department of Correction may seek grant funds to offset any costs associated with the study that cannot be provided by appropriations to those agencies.”

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 17.13, effective July 1, 2005, rewrote subdivision (8).

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(vvvvvv), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the second sentence of the first undesignated paragraph in the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” and substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” throughout this section. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-4.1.
Release of inmates. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Whenever the Secretary of Public Safety determines from data compiled by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety that it is necessary to reduce the prison population to a more manageable level or to meet the State’s obligations under law, he shall direct the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission to release on parole over a reasonable period of time a number of prisoners sufficient to that purpose. From the time the Secretary directs the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission until the prison population has been reduced to a more manageable level, the Secretary may not accept any inmates ordered transferred from local confinement facilities to the State prison system under G.S. 148-32.1(b). Further, the Secretary may return any inmate housed in the State prison system under an order entered pursuant to G.S. 148-32.1(b) to the local confinement facility from which the inmate was transferred. In order to meet the requirements of this section, the Parole Commission shall not parole any person convicted under Article 7B of Chapter 14 of a sex offense, under

G.S. 14-39

, 14-41, or 14-43.3, under G.S. 90-95(h) of a drug trafficking offense, or under

G.S. 14-17

, or any other violent felon as defined in subsection (a1) of this section. The Parole Commission may continue to consider the suitability for release of such persons in accordance with the criteria set forth in Articles 85 and 85A of Chapter 15A.

(a1)

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall at all times secure the necessary prison space to house any violent felon or habitual felon for the full active sentence imposed by the court. For purposes of this subsection, the term “violent felon” means any person convicted of the following felony offenses: first or second degree murder, voluntary manslaughter, first or second degree rape, first or second degree sexual offense, any sexual offense involving a minor, robbery, kidnapping, or assault, or attempting, soliciting, or conspiring to commit any of those offenses.

Except as provided in subsection (c), only inmates who are otherwise eligible for parole pursuant to Article 85 of Chapter 15A or pursuant to Article 3B of this Chapter may be released under this section.

Persons eligible for parole under Article 85A of Chapter 15A shall be eligible for early parole under this section nine months prior to the discharge date otherwise applicable, and six months prior to the date of automatic 90-day parole authorized by G.S. 15A-1380.2.

(c1)

through (g). Repealed by 1995 Session Laws, c. 324, s. 19.9(e).

(g1)

Expired July 1, 1996.

(h)

A person sentenced under Article 81B of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes shall not be released pursuant to this section.

(i)

This section does not apply to inmates released pursuant to

G.S. 148-64.1

.

History.

1983, c. 557, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 197(a); 1987, c. 7, ss. 1, 3, 4; c. 879, s. 1.2; 1989, c. 1, s. 1; 1990, Ex. Sess., c. 1, ss. 1-3.3; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 933, ss. 10-13; 1991, c. 187, s. 2; c. 217, ss. 6, 7; c. 437, ss. 1-9; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1036, ss. 5-7; 1993, c. 91, ss. 1-9; c. 538, s. 31; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 14, s. 64; c. 15, ss. 1-4; c. 24, s. 14(b), (e); 1995, c. 324, s. 19.9(a)-(e); 2008-199, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2015-181, s. 47; 2017-186, s. 2(wwwwww).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 148-4.1

.

§ 148-4.1.
Release of inmates. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Whenever the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction determines from data compiled by the Division of Prisons that it is necessary to reduce the prison population to a more manageable level or to meet the State’s obligations under law, the Secretary in consultation with the Secretary of the Department of Public Safety may direct the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission to release on parole over a reasonable period of time a number of prisoners sufficient to that purpose. From the time the Secretary directs the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission until the prison population has been reduced to a more manageable level, the Secretary may not accept any inmates ordered transferred from local confinement facilities to the State prison system under G.S. 148-32.1(b). Further, the Secretary may return any inmate housed in the State prison system under an order entered pursuant to G.S. 148-32.1(b) to the local confinement facility from which the inmate was transferred. In order to meet the requirements of this section, the Parole Commission shall not parole any person convicted under Article 7B of Chapter 14 of a sex offense, under

G.S. 14-39

, 14-41, or 14-43.3, under G.S. 90-95(h) of a drug trafficking offense, or under

G.S. 14-17

, or any other violent felon as defined in subsection (a1) of this section. The Parole Commission may continue to consider the suitability for release of such persons in accordance with the criteria set forth in Articles 85 and 85A of Chapter 15A.

(a1)

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction shall at all times secure the necessary prison space to house any violent felon or habitual felon for the full active sentence imposed by the court. For purposes of this subsection, the term “violent felon” means any person convicted of the following felony offenses: first or second degree murder, voluntary manslaughter, first or second degree rape, first or second degree sexual offense, any sexual offense involving a minor, robbery, kidnapping, or assault, or attempting, soliciting, or conspiring to commit any of those offenses.

Except as provided in subsection (c), only inmates who are otherwise eligible for parole pursuant to Article 85 of Chapter 15A or pursuant to Article 3B of this Chapter may be released under this section.

Persons eligible for parole under Article 85A of Chapter 15A shall be eligible for early parole under this section nine months prior to the discharge date otherwise applicable, and six months prior to the date of automatic 90-day parole authorized by G.S. 15A-1380.2.

(c1)

through (g). Repealed by 1995 Session Laws, c. 324, s. 19.9(e).

(g1)

Expired July 1, 1996.

(h)

A person sentenced under Article 81B of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes shall not be released pursuant to this section.

(i)

This section does not apply to inmates released pursuant to

G.S. 148-64.1

.

History.

1983, c. 557, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 197(a); 1987, c. 7, ss. 1, 3, 4; c. 879, s. 1.2; 1989, c. 1, s. 1; 1990, Ex. Sess., c. 1, ss. 1-3.3; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 933, ss. 10-13; 1991, c. 187, s. 2; c. 217, ss. 6, 7; c. 437, ss. 1-9; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1036, ss. 5-7; 1993, c. 91, ss. 1-9; c. 538, s. 31; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 14, s. 64; c. 15, ss. 1-4; c. 24, s. 14(b), (e); 1995, c. 324, s. 19.9(a)-(e); 2008-199, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2015-181, s. 47; 2017-186, s. 2(wwwwww); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(cccc).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 148-4.1

.

§ 148-5.
Secretary to manage prison property. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Secretary of Public Safety shall manage and have charge of all the property and effects of the State prison system, and conduct all its affairs subject to the provisions of this Chapter and the rules and regulations legally adopted for the government thereof.

History.

1933, c. 172, s. 4; 1955, c. 238, s. 3; 1967, c. 996, s. 15; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 2011-145, s. 19.1(i).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 148-5

.

§ 148-5.
Secretary to manage prison property. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction shall manage and have charge of all the property and effects of the State prison system, and conduct all its affairs subject to the provisions of this Chapter and the rules and regulations legally adopted for the government thereof.

History.

1933, c. 172, s. 4; 1955, c. 238, s. 3; 1967, c. 996, s. 15; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 2011-145, s. 19.1(i); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 148-5

.

§ 148-5.1.
Confining inmates away from victims.

If a victim or immediate family member of a victim requests that, for the safety of the victim or family member, an inmate be confined outside the county where the victim or family member resides or is employed, the Department shall make a reasonable effort to house the inmate in a facility in another county. If the inmate is not so housed in another county, the Department shall notify the victim or family member in writing.

History.

2001-433, s. 10; 2001-487, s. 120.

§§ 148-5.2 through 148-5.4.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 148-5.5.
(Contingent expiration - see note) Training and authority of security guards.

Any security guard and patrol professional that is licensed pursuant to Chapter 74C of the General Statutes and is employed to provide security services related to entry and exit, direction and movement of individuals at entry and exit, security working towers, or perimeter security patrols at a State prison facility, shall receive training on State prison policies, including policies on the use of force, prior to providing any security services at a State prison. Security guard and patrol professionals trained pursuant to this section shall have the authority to detain and use necessary force pursuant to State prison policies to prevent contraband entry or inmate escape.

History.

2020-3, s. 4.15(b); 2020-15, s. 2; 2021-180, s. 19D.2.

§ 148-6.
Custody, employment and hiring out of convicts. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall provide for receiving, and keeping in custody until discharged by law, all such convicts as may be now confined in the prison and such as may be hereafter sentenced to imprisonment therein by the several courts of this State. The Division shall have full power and authority to provide for employment of such convicts, either in the prison or on farms leased or owned by the State of North Carolina, or elsewhere, or otherwise; and may contract for the hire or employment of any able-bodied convicts upon such terms as may be just and fair, but such convicts so hired, or employed, shall remain under the actual management, control and care of the Division.

History.

1895, c. 194, s. 5; 1897, c. 270; 1901, c. 472, ss. 5, 6; Rev., s. 5391; C.S., s. 7707; 1925, c. 163; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 2007-398, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2012-83, s. 61; 2017-186, s. 2(xxxxxx).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 148-6

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-398, s. 2, effective August 21, 2007, deleted the former last sentence which read: “Provided, however, that no female convict shall be worked on public roads or streets in any manner.”

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(xxxxxx), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the first sentence of the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” at the beginning of the first sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1996 developments in the law regarding prisoner rights, see 75 N.C.L. Rev. 2428 (1997).

§ 148-6.
Custody, employment and hiring out of convicts. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction shall provide for receiving, and keeping in custody until discharged by law, all such convicts as may be now confined in the prison and such as may be hereafter sentenced to imprisonment therein by the several courts of this State. The Division shall have full power and authority to provide for employment of such convicts, either in the prison or on farms leased or owned by the State of North Carolina, or elsewhere, or otherwise; and may contract for the hire or employment of any able-bodied convicts upon such terms as may be just and fair, but such convicts so hired, or employed, shall remain under the actual management, control and care of the Division.

History.

1895, c. 194, s. 5; 1897, c. 270; 1901, c. 472, ss. 5, 6; Rev., s. 5391; C.S., s. 7707; 1925, c. 163; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 2007-398, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2012-83, s. 61; 2017-186, s. 2(xxxxxx); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 148-6

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-398, s. 2, effective August 21, 2007, deleted the former last sentence which read: “Provided, however, that no female convict shall be worked on public roads or streets in any manner.”

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(xxxxxx), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the first sentence of the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” at the beginning of the first sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1996 developments in the law regarding prisoner rights, see 75 N.C.L. Rev. 2428 (1997).

§ 148-7.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 233, s. 1.

§ 148-8.
[Transferred]

Transferred to § 66-58(b)(15) by Session Laws 1975, c. 730, s. 2.

§ 148-8.1.
[Transferred]

Transferred to § 66-58(b)(16) by Session Laws 1975, c. 730, s. 3.

§ 148-9.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 476, s. 138.

§ 148-10.
Department of Public Safety to supervise sanitary and health conditions of prisoners. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Department of Public Safety shall have general supervision over the sanitary and health conditions of the central prison, over the prison camps, or other places of confinement of prisoners under the jurisdiction of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department.

History.

1917, c. 286, s. 8; 1919, c. 80, s. 4; C.S., s. 7714; 1925, c. 163; 1933, c. 172, s. 22; 1943, c. 409; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1989, c. 727, s. 219(37); 1997-443, s. 11A.111; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2012-83, s. 61; 2015-241, s. 14.30(u); 2017-186, s. 2(yyyyyy); 2021-158, s. 9.

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 148-10

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendment to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(u), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Environmental Quality” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources” in the section heading and section text.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(yyyyyy), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2021-158, s. 9, effective September 16, 2021, in the section heading and the section, substituted “Public Safety” for “Environmental Quality”; and substituted the last occurrence of “Department” for “Department of Public Safety, and shall make periodic examinations of the same and report to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety the conditions found there with respect to the sanitary and hygienic care of such prisoners.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” in this section. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “A New Explanation for Equitable Tolling Under § 1983 and the Prison Litigation Reform Act,” see 99 N. C. L. Rev. Addendum 115 (2021).

§ 148-10.
Department of Public Safety to supervise sanitary and health conditions of prisoners. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Department of Public Safety shall have general supervision over the sanitary and health conditions of the central prison, over the prison camps, or other places of confinement of prisoners under the jurisdiction of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction.

History.

1917, c. 286, s. 8; 1919, c. 80, s. 4; C.S., s. 7714; 1925, c. 163; 1933, c. 172, s. 22; 1943, c. 409; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1989, c. 727, s. 219(37); 1997-443, s. 11A.111; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2012-83, s. 61; 2015-241, s. 14.30(u); 2017-186, s. 2(yyyyyy); 2021-158, s. 9; 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 148-10

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendment to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

At the direction of the Revisor of Statutes, “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” was substituted for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department” at the end of this section to give effect to the intent of Session Laws
2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(u), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Environmental Quality” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources” in the section heading and section text.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(yyyyyy), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2021-158, s. 9, effective September 16, 2021, in the section heading and the section, substituted “Public Safety” for “Environmental Quality”; and substituted the last occurrence of “Department” for “Department of Public Safety, and shall make periodic examinations of the same and report to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety the conditions found there with respect to the sanitary and hygienic care of such prisoners.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” in this section. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “A New Explanation for Equitable Tolling Under § 1983 and the Prison Litigation Reform Act,” see 99 N. C. L. Rev. Addendum 115 (2021).

§ 148-10.1.
Employment of clinical chaplains for inmates. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety is authorized and directed to employ clinical chaplains to provide moral, spiritual and social counselling and ministerial services to inmates in the custody of the Secretary of Public Safety. The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall seek to employ a diversity of qualified persons having differing faiths which are to the extent practicable reflective of the professed religious composition of the inmate population.

History.

1977, c. 950, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2017-186, s. 2(zzzzzz).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(zzzzzz), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” at the end of the first sentence and substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” twice. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-10.1.
Employment of clinical chaplains for inmates. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction is authorized and directed to employ clinical chaplains to provide moral, spiritual and social counselling and ministerial services to inmates in the custody of the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction. The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction shall seek to employ a diversity of qualified persons having differing faiths which are to the extent practicable reflective of the professed religious composition of the inmate population.

History.

1977, c. 950, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2017-186, s. 2(zzzzzz); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(zzzzzz), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” at the end of the first sentence and substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” twice. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.